Arkansas, session 2025, SB255.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 20-56-202(9), concerning the definition of
"drug" within the Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, is amended to read as
follows:
(9) “Drug” means:
(A) Articles recognized in the official United States
Pharmacopoeia and National Formulary, the official Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia
of the United States, the official National Formulary, or in any supplement
to any of them;
(B) Articles intended for use in diagnosis, cure,
mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in humans or other animals;
(C) Articles other than food intended to affect the
structure or any function of the bodies of humans or other animals; and
(D) Articles intended for use as a component of any
article specified in subdivisions (9)(A)-(C) of this section, but does not
include devices or their components, parts, or accessories; and
(E) Food other than meat that contains a vaccine or
*JMB213*
04-07-2025 15:30:31 JMB213

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB255
vaccine material;

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 20-56-202, concerning definitions within
the Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, is amended to add an additional subdivision
to read as follows:
(20) "Vaccine or vaccine material" means a substance intended
for use in humans to stimulate the production of antibodies and provide
immunity against disease, prepared from the causative agent of a disease, its
products, or a synthetic substitute, treated to act as an antigen without
inducing the disease, that is authorized or approved by the United States
Food and Drug Administration.

SECTION 3. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that universities and industries
are studying the possibility of turning edible plants into mRNA vaccines to
be sold to consumers; that with the increasing advancements in technology,
consumers in this state should be aware of any vaccine or vaccine material in
food; that medical labeling should be required for any food that contains a
vaccine or vaccine material; and that this act is immediately necessary to
protect the health and safety of the consumers in Arkansas and to ensure that
all products containing vaccines or vaccine materials are properly labeled.
Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately
necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall
become effective on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.

/s/C. Penzo




04-07-2025 15:30:31 JMB213